Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4768.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 5. (1) The department shall promulgate and enforce rules to carry out this act pursuant to in accordance with the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. The rules, at a minimum, shall must include the following: (a) Requirements for the submission of reports, plans, and specifications for the design and construction of all or a part of a waterworks system, or a part thereof, and a plan for operating and maintaining all or a part of the a waterworks system, including the protection of water quality within the distribution system as necessary to protect the public health. (b) State drinking water standards and associated monitoring requirements, the attainment and maintenance of which are necessary to protect the public health. (c) The classification of all or a part of a waterworks systems or portions thereof, system, the examination for certification of the operators of those waterworks systems including shift operators of water treatment systems, and for the issuance, suspension, and revocation of certificates. (d) Criteria for capacity assessments performed by the department at community supplies, nontransient noncommunity water supplies, or a public water supply applying to the department for assistance under part 54 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.5401 to 324.5418. (e) Requirements for provision of facilities by public water supplies that will assure ensure an adequate and reliable supply of drinking water on a continuous basis. (f) Requirements for the establishment and administration of the microplastics program created in section 6a. (2) Rules governing public water supplies promulgated under former 1913 PA 98 , and which that were in effect on January 4, 1977 are continued in accordance with section 31 of the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.231, and may be amended or rescinded by the director under this act. (3) No rule promulgated may require the addition of any substance for preventive health care purposes unrelated to contamination of drinking water. Sec. 6a. (1) Beginning July 1, 2027, and continuing until July 1, 2030, the department shall establish and administer a microplastics program to establish microplastic baseline conditions in public water supplies. As part of the microplastics program, the department shall monitor and test public water supplies on a quarterly basis using sampling and analytical methods consistent with methods used or described by the International Joint Commission, the American Society for Testing and Materials, the United States Environmental Protection Agency, the American National Standards Institute, the state of California, or best available methods or technology. The microplastics program is intended to provide for a preliminary risk assessment to study the effects of microplastics in drinking water. Under the microplastics program, the department shall consider all of the following: (a) Shoreline surface water drinking water sources from the Great Lakes. (b) Major tributaries that support public water supplies. (c) Inland surface water lakes that provide drinking water. (d) Direct use of groundwater for drinking water within and near agricultural operations. (e) Use of groundwater or drinking water within 1 mile of a landfill operation. (f) The size of the public water supply. (g) Impacts on environmental justice. (h) Quarterly sample collection and analysis. (2) Not later than July 1, 2031, the department shall prepare and submit a report to the standing committees and the appropriations subcommittees of the senate and house of representatives with primary responsibility for issues under the jurisdiction of the department and make the report available on the department's website. The report must include the following: (a) A summary of findings, including, but not limited to, all of the following: (i) Reports or technical memoranda that provide a summary of each quarterly test described under subsection (1), including, but not limited to, the following information: (A) Drinking water source, location, and description. (B) Sampling date. (C) Testing methodology. (D) Microplastic shape, if available. (E) Potential microplastic sources. (F) Polymer type, if available. (ii) The quantities of microplastics in public water supplies, including the quantities in the water source that supplies the public water supply. (b) Recommendations for next steps for addressing the effects and presence of microplastics in public water supplies, including, but not limited to, the following: (i) The toxicity limit of microplastics based on best available, peer-reviewed research or toxicity studies and findings of the United States Environmental Protection Agency. (ii) A preliminary risk assessment. (iii) An overview of findings and critical issues. (iv) Recommendations for continued and expanded monitoring and analysis and public protection. (3) As used in this section: (a) "Microplastics" means a solid plastic material that has at least 3 dimensions, measures less than 5 millimeters in size, and may contain chemical additives or other substances. Microplastics do not include naturally occurring, non-chemically modified polymers. (b) "Plastic" means synthetic material composed of organic polymers produced by linking monomers through a chemical reaction and may include chemical additives or other substances. Plastic does not include naturally occurring, non-chemically modified polymers.